Massachusetts, session 194th, H2507.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by adding at the end the following section:
The Department, in consultation with the Health Policy Commission and the Center for
Health Information Analysis, shall commission a study to examine current access to essential
health services, as defined by the department of public health under section 51G of chapter 111,
provided by the Commonwealth’s acute care hospitals and in-patient psychiatric hospitals, the
effect of the discontinuation of essential health services on that access, the projected need for
those services in all regions of the Commonwealth over the next decade and provide
recommendations as to how ensure access to those essential health services. This study shall
of 2

include, but not be limited to (i) the current number of beds and services provided by each
hospital in each region, including the most recent year’s admission and discharge data for each
service by hospital; (ii) review discontinuations of essential health services by hospitals since
1992 and their effect on access to these essential health services; (ii) review hospital closures
since 1992 and their effect on access to these essential health services;(iii) review plans provided
to the department of public health following the discontinuation of essential services for
compliance and identify where essential health services were provided following the
discontinuation; (iv) calculate projected need for essential health services in each region; (v)
calculate projected need, if any, for providers of essential health services to meet regional needs
over the next decade; (vi) examine financial conditions that might lead to the discontinuation of
essential health services, including but not limited to private and public reimbursement rates;
(vii) identify essential health services by region that might be vulnerable to discontinuation over
the next three years; (viii) examine the need for additional post in-patient discharge services
(viii) Identify steps protect essential health services provided by financially vulnerable acute acre
and inpatient psychiatric hospitals; (ix) review methods implemented in other states to
discourage and manage the discontinuation of essential health services by acute care hospitals
and in-patient psychiatric hospitals closures; and (x) recommend any policy changes to assure
access to essential health services in all regions of the Commonwealth.
of 2